Utah statutes.
76-1-503.   Presumption of fact.
An evidentiary presumption established by this code or other penal statute has
the following consequences:
(1)  When evidence of facts which support the presumption exist, the issue of
the existence of the presumed fact must be submitted to the jury unless the
court is satisfied that the evidence as a whole clearly negates the presumed
fact;
(2)  In submitting the issue of the existence of a presumed fact to the jury,
the court shall charge that while the presumed fact must on all evidence be
proved beyond a reasonable doubt, the law regards the facts giving rise to the
presumption as evidence of the presumed fact.
